Tennessee, session 114, HB0328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-3-121(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(1)
(A) Subject to subdivision (b)(1)(B) and § 58-3-112, the commissioner
shall offer discounts for activities, retail purchases, camping, and lodging at state
parks to veterans who are Tennessee residents with the same frequency, and at
the same rates, as the discounts for activities, retail purchases, camping, and
lodging at state parks that are offered to state employees.
(B) In addition to the discounts required by subdivision (b)(1)(A), the
commissioner shall offer a year-round discount in the amount of no less than fifty
percent (50%) for camping and overnight cabin lodging fees at state parks to a
veteran who:
(i) Has a service-connected disability that is determined by the
veterans' administration to constitute a one hundred percent (100%)
permanent total disability; and
(ii) Is a resident of this state.
(C)
HB0328
001809
- 1 -

(i) Each veteran must be required to show proof of veteran status,
as determined by the commissioner, and residence in this state prior to
being granted a discount offered pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)(A).
(ii) Certification from the veterans' administration indicating the
veteran's percentage of service-connected disability and proof of
residence in this state must be presented in order to receive the
discounted fee required by subdivision (b)(1)(B). The discount required
by subdivision (b)(1)(B) is subject to availability, as determined by the
commissioner, and only applies to reservations made within thirty (30)
days of the intended stay.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-3-121(b)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-3-112, is amended by designating
the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new subsection:
(b) The requirements of subsection (a) are in addition to the discounts for
veterans required by § 11-3-121.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001809